North Carolina statutes. Chapter 15. Criminal Procedure.
Article 4. Search Warrants. [Repealed]

§ 15-25.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1286, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to this Chapter. For present provisions as to search warrants, see

G.S. 15A-241

through 15A-259.

Legal Periodicals.

For note, “Mighty Morphin’ Power Range R: The Intersection of the Fourth Amendment and Evolving Police Technology,” see 8 Elon L. Rev. 555 (2016).

§§ 15-25.1,
15-25.2.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1969, c. 869, s. 8.

§§ 15-26 through 15-27.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1286, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to this Chapter. For present provisions as to search warrants, see

G.S. 15A-241

through 15A-259.